Georgia, session 2025_26, HB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
12 SECTION 1.
13 This Act shall be known as the "Georgia HOA Accountability and Community
14 Empowerment Act (HACEA)."
H. B. 62
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0034
15 SECTION 2.
16 The purpose of this Act is to establish fair, transparent, and enforceable regulations for
17 homeowners' associations, including condominium associations and property owner's
18 associations, to ensure accountability, enhance resident engagement, and protect the interests
19 of community members.
20 SECTION 3.
21 Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
22 condominiums, is amended by revising paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code
23 Section 44-3-77, relating to contents of declaration, as follows:
24 "(8) The allocation to each unit of a number of votes in the association of one vote in
25 accordance with Code Section 44-3-79."
26 SECTION 4.
27 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 44-3-79, relating to
28 allocation – votes in association, how votes cast, and majority vote requirements, as follows:
29 "44-3-79.
30 (a) The declaration shall allocate a number of votes in the association to each unit depicted
31 on plats or plans that comply with subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 44-3-83. The
32 allocation of such votes may be by percentage, fraction, formula, or any other method
33 which indicates the relative voting power allocated to each unit. If an equal vote is
34 allocated to each unit, the declaration may merely so state. All of the votes in the
35 association shall be allocated among the units depicted on such plats or plans and shall be
36 subject to reallocation as provided in this article one vote to each unit.
37 (b) Since a unit owner may be more than one person, if only one of those persons is
38 present at a meeting of the association or is voting by proxy, ballot, or written consent, that
39 such person shall be entitled to cast the votes vote pertaining to that unit. However, if more
H. B. 62
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0034
40 than one of those such persons is are present or each executes a proxy, ballot, or written
41 consent, the vote pertaining to that unit shall be cast only in accordance with their
42 unanimous agreement unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise;
43 and such consent shall be conclusively presumed if any one of them purports to cast the
44 votes vote pertaining to that unit without protest being made immediately by any of the
45 others to the person presiding over the meeting or vote.
46 (c) The votes vote pertaining to any unit may, and, in the case of any unit owner not a
47 natural person or persons, shall, be cast pursuant to a proxy or proxies duly executed by or
48 on behalf of the unit owner or, in cases where the unit owner is more than one person, by
49 or on behalf of the joint owners of the unit. No such proxy shall be revocable except as
50 provided in Code Section 14-2-722 or 14-3-724 or by written notice delivered to the
51 association by the unit owner or by any joint owners of a unit. Any proxy shall be void if
52 it is not dated or if it purports to be revocable without such notice. Any proxy shall also
53 reasonably identify the unit owner or owners and the unit for which it is a proxy. If such
54 proxy does not reasonably identify the unit owner or owners and the unit for which it is a
55 proxy, such proxy shall be void.
56 (d) Except in the case of any condominium of which no part is restricted exclusively to
57 residential use, if 50 percent or more of the votes in the association pertain to 25 percent
58 or less of the condominium units, then in any case where a majority vote is required by the
59 condominium instruments or by this article the requirement for such a majority shall be
60 deemed to include, in addition to the specified majority of the votes, assent by the unit
61 owners of a like majority of the condominium units.
62 (e)(d) Anything in this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, no votes vote in the
63 association shall be deemed to pertain to any condominium unit during such time as the
64 unit owner thereof is the association nor shall any vote be allocated to any condominium
65 unit unless the condominium unit is depicted on plats or plans that comply with
66 subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 44-3-83. Except to the extent otherwise expressly
H. B. 62
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0034
67 provided or permitted by this article, the votes vote allocated to any condominium unit
68 shall not be altered."
69 SECTION 5.
70 Said article is further amended by revising Code Sections 44-3-103 and 44-3-104, relating
71 to quorums at meetings of association or board and directors and officers and eligibility,
72 respectively, as follows;
73 "44-3-103.
74 (a) Unless the condominium instruments or bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum shall be
75 deemed present throughout any meeting, except the annual meeting, of the members of the
76 association if persons entitled to cast more than one-third of the votes are present at the
77 beginning of the meeting. Unless the condominium instruments or bylaws specify a larger
78 percentage, the presence of persons entitled to cast one-half of the votes of the board of
79 directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business at any meeting of the
80 board.
81 (b) A quorum shall be deemed present throughout any annual meeting of the members of
82 the association. Decisions and elections may proceed regardless of the number of members
83 of the association in attendance at such meeting.
84 44-3-104.
85 (a) If the condominium instruments provide that any member of the board of directors or
86 any officer of the association must be a unit owner, then, notwithstanding paragraph (1) of
87 subsection (a) of Code Section 44-3-75, the Members of a board of directors or any officer
88 of an association shall be a unit owner with residency in the community. A unit owner
89 establishes residency by being a unit owner of a condominium governed by the
90 condominium association, paying utilities for the unit, using the unit address for voter
91 registration, and listing the unit on his or her driver's license or other government
H. B. 62
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0034
92 identification. Nonresident individuals shall not be eligible to serve on the board. The
93 term 'unit owner' in such context shall, unless the condominium instruments otherwise
94 provide, be deemed to include, without limitation, any shareholder, director, officer, partner
95 in, or trustee of any person who is, either alone or in conjunction with any other person or
96 persons, a unit owner. Any individual who would not be eligible to serve as a member of
97 the board of directors or officer were he or she not a shareholder, director, officer, partner
98 in, or trustee of such a person shall be deemed to have disqualified himself or herself from
99 continuing in office if he or she ceases to have any such affiliation with that such person.
100 (b) A board of directors shall consist of three or more individuals. Only one individual
101 residing in a unit shall be eligible to serve on such board at any time.
102 (c) The association shall provide proof of meeting the minimum number of board members
103 as part of filing its annual registration for the Secretary of State pursuant to Code
104 Section 14-2-1622 or Code Section 14-3-1622.
105 (d) Failure to meet the requirements in subsection (c) of this Code section shall subject the
106 condominium association to administrative suspension by the Secretary of State until the
107 following conditions are met:
108 (1) A successful election is held to reinstate the board with at least three members; and
109 (2) A reinstatement request providing proof of meeting the minimum number of board
110 members is submitted and approved by the Secretary of State."
111 SECTION 6.
112 Said article is further amended by adding new Code sections to read as follows:
113 "44-3-104.1.
114 (a) Elections of board members shall be held not less frequently than annually. Board
115 members shall be elected by winning a majority of the voting units. Elections shall be held
116 in accordance with the term limits set forth in the association's bylaws.
H. B. 62
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0034
117 (b) Ballots shall include the names of candidates and shall be given to each voting
118 member, including such members voting by proxy.
119 (c) The association shall maintain electronic scans of each ballot to be made available for
120 inspection by unit owners for one year following any election for board members.
121 (d) Election results shall be filed with the Secretary of State's Corporations Division
122 within 30 days of such election.
123 (e) The Secretary of State shall certify election results not fewer than 30 days nor more
124 than 45 days after such election or more than 15 days after the Secretary of State's
125 Corporations Division resolves election contests, whichever is later. The Secretary of
126 State's Corporations Division shall maintain certified election records for at least three
127 years after certification.
128 44-3-104.2.
129 (a) A petition to contest the result of an election provided for in Code Section 44-3-104.1
130 shall be filed with the Secretary of State's Corporations Division by a unit owner within
131 seven days of an association filing an election result with such division. Such petition shall
132 allege:
133 (1) The contestant's qualification to institute the contest;
134 (2) The contestant's desire to contest the result of such election;
135 (3) The name of each person who was a candidate at such election;
136 (4) Each ground of contest;
137 (5) The date the association filed the result of such election with the Secretary of State's
138 Corporations Division;
139 (6) The relief sought; and
140 (7) Such other facts as are necessary to provide a full, particular, and explicit statement
141 of such contest.
H. B. 62
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0034
142 (b) Such contestant may file documentation and other evidence to support the contest with
143 the petition.
144 (c) The petition shall be verified by the affidavit of each contestant. Such affidavit shall
145 be taken and subscribed before some person authorized by law to administer oaths and
146 shall state that the contestant believes the facts alleged therein are true and that according
147 to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the contested result of the election is incorrect
148 and the petition to contest the same is made in good faith.
149 (d) Upon the filing of a petition provided for in this Code section, the Secretary of State's
150 Corporations Division shall issue to the association notice requiring the association to
151 answer such petition by a day to be fixed in such notice not more than ten days nor fewer
152 than five days after the service of such notice. Such notice shall be sent to the association
153 by certified mail.
154 (e) After the filing of a petition and answer, the Secretary of State's Corporations Division
155 shall render a decision on the petition not more than 15 days after the filing of such answer.
156 When a contestant prevails, the election for board members shall be repeated. When the
157 association prevails, the results of such election shall stand as filed with the Secretary of
158 State's Corporations Division.
159 (f) Petitions filed pursuant to this Code section after the Secretary of State's Corporations
160 Division has certified the election but on or before seven days after the association filed the
161 election result shall be deemed timely.
162 44-3-104.3.
163 The Secretary of State is authorized to investigate complaints, enforce compliance, and
164 impose penalties for violations of this Act."
H. B. 62
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0034
165 SECTION 7.
166 Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 44, relating to property owners' associations, is amended by
167 revising Code Section 44-3-224, relating to voting at association meetings, as follows:
168 "44-3-224.
169 (a) The declaration shall allocate one vote to each lot.
170 (a)(b) Since a lot owner may be more than one person, if only one of those persons is
171 present at a meeting of the association, or is voting by proxy, ballot, or written consent, that
172 such person shall be entitled to cast the votes vote pertaining to that lot. However, if more
173 than one of those such persons is are present, or each executes a proxy, ballot, or written
174 consent, the vote pertaining to that lot shall be cast only in accordance with their
175 unanimous agreement unless the instrument expressly provides otherwise; and such
176 consent shall be conclusively presumed if any one of them purports to cast the votes vote
177 pertaining to that lot without protest being made immediately by any of the others to the
178 person presiding over the meeting or vote.
179 (b)(c) The votes vote pertaining to any lot may, and, in the case of any lot owner not a
180 natural person or persons, shall, be cast pursuant to a proxy or proxies duly executed by or
181 on behalf of the lot owner or, in cases where the lot owner is more than one person, by or
182 on behalf of the joint owners of the lot. No such proxy shall be revocable except as
183 provided in Code Section 14-2-722 or Code Section 14-3-724 or by written notice
184 delivered to the association by the lot owner or by any joint owners of a lot. Any proxy
185 shall be void if it is not dated or if it purports to be revocable without such notice. Any
186 proxy shall reasonably identify the lot owner or owners and the lot for which it is a proxy.
187 If such proxy does not reasonably identify the lot owner or owners and the lot for which
188 it is a proxy, such proxy shall be void."
189 SECTION 8.
190 Said article is further amended by adding new Code sections to read as follows:
H. B. 62
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0034
191 "44-3-227.1.
192 (a) Members of a board or any officer of an association shall be a lot owner with residency
193 in the community. A lot owner establishes residency by being a lot owner of property
194 governed by the property owners' association, paying utilities for the lot, using the lot
195 address for voter registration, and listing the lot on his or her driver's license or other
196 government identification. Nonresident individuals shall not be eligible to serve on the
197 board. The term 'lot owner' in such context shall, unless the instrument otherwise provides,
198 be deemed to include, without limitation, any shareholder, director, officer, partner in, or
199 trustee of any person who is, either alone or in conjunction with any other person or
200 persons, a lot owner. Any individual who would not be eligible to serve as a board member
201 or officer were he or she not a shareholder, director, officer, partner in, or trustee of such
202 a person shall be deemed to have disqualified himself or herself from continuing in office
203 if he or she ceases to have any such affiliation with such person.
204 (b) A board shall consist of three or more individuals. Only one individual residing on a
205 property shall be eligible to serve on a board at any time.
206 (c) The association shall provide proof of meeting the minimum number of board members
207 as part of filing its annual registration for the Secretary of State pursuant to Code
208 Section 14-2-1622 or Code Section 16-3-1622.
209 (d) Failure to meet the requirements in subsection (c) of this Code section shall subject the
210 property owner's association to administrative suspension by the Secretary of State until
211 the following conditions are met:
212 (1) A successful election is held to reinstate the board with at least three members; and
213 (2) A reinstatement request providing proof of meeting the minimum number of board
214 members is submitted and approved by the Secretary of State.
H. B. 62
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0034
215 44-3-227.2.
216 (a) Elections of board members shall be held not less frequently than annually. Board
217 members shall be elected by winning a majority of the voting lot owners. Elections shall
218 be held in accordance with the term limits set forth in the association's bylaws.
219 (b) Ballots shall include the names of candidates and shall be given to each voting
220 member, including such members voting by proxy.
221 (c) The association shall maintain electronic scans of each ballot to be made available for
222 inspection by lot owners following any election for board members.
223 (d) Election results shall be filed with the Secretary of State's Corporations Division
224 within 30 days of such election.
225 (e) The Secretary of State shall certify board election results not fewer than 30 days nor
226 more than 45 days after such election or more than 15 days after the Secretary of State's
227 Corporations Division resolves election contests, whichever is later. The Secretary of
228 State's Corporations Division shall maintain certified election records for at least three
229 years after certification.
230 44-3-227.3.
231 (a) A petition to contest the election result shall be filed with the Secretary of State's
232 Corporations Division by a lot owner within seven days of an association filing an election
233 result with such division. Such petition shall allege:
234 (1) The contestant's qualification to institute the contest;
235 (2) The contestant's desire to contest the result of such election;
236 (3) The name of each person who was a candidate at such election;
237 (4) Each ground of contest;
238 (5) The date the association filed the result with the Secretary of State's Corporations
239 Division;
240 (6) The relief sought; and
H. B. 62
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0034
241 (7) Such other facts as are necessary to provide a full, particular, and explicit statement
242 of such contest.
243 (b) Such contestant may file documentation and other evidence to support the contest with
244 the petition.
245 (c) The petition shall be verified by the affidavit of each contestant. Such affidavit shall
246 be taken and subscribed before some person authorized by law to administer oaths and
247 shall state that the contestant believes the facts alleged therein are true and that according
248 to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the contested result of the election is incorrect
249 and the petition to contest the same is made in good faith.
250 (d) Upon the filing of a petition provided for in this Code section, the Secretary of State's
251 Corporations Division shall issue to the association notice requiring the association to
252 answer such petition by a day to be fixed in such notice not more than ten days nor fewer
253 than five days after the service of such notice. Such notice shall be sent to the association
254 by certified mail.
255 (e) After the filing of a petition and answer, the Secretary of State's Corporations Division
256 shall render a decision on the petition not more than 15 days after such filing of the answer.
257 When a contestant prevails, the election for the board members shall be repeated. When
258 the association prevails, the results of such election shall stand as filed with the Secretary
259 of State's Corporations Division.
260 (f) Petitions filed pursuant to this Code section after the Secretary of State's Corporations
261 Division has certified the election but on or before seven days after the association filed the
262 election result shall be deemed timely.
263 44-3-227.4.
264 The Secretary of State is authorized to investigate complaints, enforce compliance, and
265 impose penalties for violations of this Act."
H. B. 62
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0034
266 SECTION 9.
267 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 44-3-228, relating to presence of
268 quorums at meetings, as follows:
269 "44-3-228.
270 (a) Unless the instrument or bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum shall be deemed present
271 throughout any meeting, except the annual meeting, of the members of the association if
272 persons entitled to cast more than one-third of the votes are present at the beginning of the
273 meeting. Unless the instrument or bylaws specify a larger percentage, the presence of
274 persons entitled to cast one-half of the votes of the board of directors shall constitute a
275 quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of the board.
276 (b) A quorum shall be deemed present throughout any annual meeting of the members of
277 the association. Decisions and elections may proceed regardless of the number of members
278 of the association in attendance at such meeting."
279 SECTION 10.
280 This Act shall become effective six months after its approval by the Governor and shall apply
281 to any condominium association or property owners' association created on or after such date,
282 any association election held on or after such date, any annual meeting held on or after such
283 date, and any annual registration filed on or after such date.
284 SECTION 11.
285 The provisions of this Act are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held
286 unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of such court shall not
287 affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.
288 SECTION 12.
289 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 62
- 12 -